Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. Log Brands.

Sec. 45.50.210.
Application for registration of distinctive brand.

The owner of timber property that the owner puts or intends to put into a coastal water, lake, river, creek, or other waterway of the state for the purpose of rafting or transporting by floating or towing, shall apply to the department for the exclusive use of a distinctive brand to identify it.

The application shall be in writing and accompanied by an acceptable diagram or design on paper of the proposed brand, and the prescribed fee.

The department shall promptly register the brand and issue a certificate of registration to the applicant granting the applicant the exclusive use of the brand for a period of five years. The department may not register a brand that is so similar in design to one presently registered in the name of another person that one brand is not clearly distinguishable from the other.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 191 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For log brands, see 11 AAC 71, art. 5.

Sec. 45.50.220.
Termination and renewal.

The right to the exclusive use of a registered brand ceases at the end of five years from the date of registration.
The brand may be renewed by application before expiration, together with the payment of the prescribed fee.
Renewals may be made successively for five-year terms.

History.

(§ 2 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For log brands, see 11 AAC 71, art. 5.

Sec. 45.50.230.
Presumption from display.

Each piece of timber property put or intended to be put in a coastal water, lake, river, creek, or other waterway of the state for the purpose of rafting or transporting by floating or towing shall display upon at least one end the registered brand and is presumed

while in the possession and control of the person in whose name the brand is registered, to be the sole property of that person; and

to be “abandoned property” if, 30 days after the time public notice has expired as provided under AS

45.50.234

or 90 days from the date of reporting required under AS

45.50.232

or from the date of expiration of any extended recovery period under AS

45.50.237

, it is not in the possession and control of the owner or rightful transporter and is

adrift in the water of the state,

stranded on the beaches, marshes, tideland, or shoreland of the water of the state, or

partially or wholly submerged in the water of the state.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 232 SLA 1976.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 191 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 168 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 7 ch 232 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For log brands, see 11 AAC 71, art. 5.

Sec. 45.50.232.
Reporting of lost logs to the department.

The owner or rightful transporter of timber property not in the possession or control of the owner or transporter, which has become adrift in the waters of the state, stranded on the beaches, marshes, tideland, or shoreland of the water of the state, or partially or wholly submerged in the water of the state, shall report the loss of the timber property within 15 days from the time the loss is discovered to the department, indicating the probable date lost, the place lost, if known, the probable area of recovery, and any other information that the department may require. Unless the time for recovery is extended under AS

45.50.237

, the rightful transporter or owner of timber property has 90 days from the date the loss is reported to recover the timber property. After 90 days from the date of reporting or upon the expiration of any extension granted under AS

45.50.237

, the timber property is considered to be abandoned, notice is not required to be published under AS

45.50.234

, and the timber property is presumed to be the property of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 232 SLA 1976)

Sec. 45.50.234.
Publication of notice of intent to claim abandoned property.

Except as provided in AS

45.50.232

, the department shall publish notice of its intent to claim abandoned timber property under AS

45.50.210

—

45.50.325

for not less than 30 days from the date that first notice is published under this section.
Notice shall be published once a week for at least three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation nearest the area where the timber property is located and, if feasible, posted in a centrally located public place within or in close proximity to the area where the timber property is located.

History.

(§ 2 ch 232 SLA 1976)

Sec. 45.50.235.
Ownership of unbranded and abandoned timber property.

Timber property that is unbranded or on which a brand is not distinguishable and that is located in a coastal water, lake, river, creek, or other waterway of the state or on state owned coastline is presumed to be the property of the state. Timber property that is abandoned property as defined in AS

45.50.230(a)(2)

is presumed to be the property of the state 90 days after the period of reporting as required in AS

45.50.232

unless an extension has been granted, or 30 days after the period of notice has expired as provided under AS

45.50.234

.

Timber property that becomes state property under the provisions of this section may be sold under terms and conditions established by the director of the division of lands.

History.

(§ 4 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 68 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 232 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 73 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For unbranded or abandoned timber property sales, see 11 AAC 71, art. 4.

Sec. 45.50.237.
Extension of period for recovery of timber property.

The department shall extend the 90-day period for recovery of timber property after reporting specified in AS

45.50.232

if a good faith effort to salvage the timber property is being made by the person requesting the extension.
Extensions shall be granted for limited periods only but may be continued until salvage is completed, and guidelines shall be established specifying what constitutes a good faith effort for purposes of extension under regulations adopted by the department. Definition of a good faith effort must include the specification of extraordinary circumstances of weather and tide conditions that may preclude direct and immediate salvage operations.

History.

(§ 4 ch 232 SLA 1976)

Sec. 45.50.240.
Property rights in brand.

Each registered brand is the property of the person in whose name it is registered.
It is personal property and may be sold, hypothecated, assigned, or otherwise transferred.

History.

(§ 4 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 5 ch 168 SLA 1970)

Sec. 45.50.250.
Recording brand.

The commissioner shall file for record in the department files a true copy of each certificate of registration issued.

History.

(§ 5 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 6 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 68 SLA 1975)

Sec. 45.50.260.
Registration upon transfer.

If a transfer of a brand is made, including transfer by assignment or sale, a true copy of the transfer instrument shall be filed for record with the department.
The fee for transfer is as specified by regulation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 7 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 68 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For log brands, see 11 AAC 71, art. 5.

Sec. 45.50.270.
Publication of current list of brands.

The department shall publish a list of brands as of December 31 of each even numbered year.
The list must show the design of each brand, the name and address of the owner, the date of registration, and any transfer of a brand during the previous two years. Copies of the list shall be available to the public upon request.

History.

(§ 6 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 8 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 68 SLA 1975)

Sec. 45.50.280.
Certified copies of certificate or transfer instrument.

Upon request and payment of the prescribed fee, the department shall furnish a certified copy of a brand certificate of registration or a certified copy of the instrument of transfer of a brand.

History.

(§ 8 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 9 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 7 ch 68 SLA 1975)

Sec. 45.50.290.
Certificate of registration as evidence.

A certificate of registration of a brand or a certified copy of the certificate or of the instrument of transfer of a registered brand is prima facie evidence of the ownership of the timber property impressed with or displaying the registered brand.

History.

(§ 8 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 10 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 8 ch 68 SLA 1975)

Sec. 45.50.300.
Registration as constructive notice.

Registration by the department and filing for record in the department files of a true copy of the certificate of registration or the transfer instrument is constructive notice of the ownership of the brand.

History.

(§ 8 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 11 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 9 ch 68 SLA 1975)

Sec. 45.50.310.
Disposition of fees.

Fees collected under AS

45.50.210

—

45.50.325

by the department shall be deposited in the general fund of the state.

History.

(§ 9 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 12 ch 168 SLA 1970)

Sec. 45.50.315.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement AS

45.50.210

—

45.50.325

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 168 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For unbranded or abandoned timber property sales, see 11 AAC 71, art. 4.

For log brands, see 11 AAC 71, art. 5.

Sec. 45.50.320.
Penalties for fraudulent branding or other acts.

A person who fraudulently brands timber property with a brand which the person knows or has reasonable cause to know is the registered brand of another person, or who knowingly alters, defaces, obliterates, or destroys a registered brand impressed or displayed upon timber property, or who knowingly sells or disposes of, or attempts to sell or dispose of, or to convert or appropriate to the person’s own use, without the written consent of the owner, timber property impressed with or displaying upon it a registered brand of another person, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment in jail for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 7 ch 51 SLA 1953; am § 14 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 61 ch 32 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For log brands, see 11 AAC 71, art. 5.

Sec. 45.50.325.
Definitions.

In AS

45.50.210

—

45.50.325

,

“brand” includes a mark or other designation that has been registered with the department;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“department” means the Department of Natural Resources;

“rightful transporter” means a person who has an executory contract interest in the timber property the person is transporting, or that person’s designee, or one who, in the normal usage of the trade, transports, or aids in the transportation of, timber property for the benefit of and authorized by the owner of the timber property;

“timber property” means logs, pilings, poles, other timbers, boom sticks, and boom chains.

History.

(§ 15 ch 168 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 68 SLA 1975; am § 5 ch 232 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Administrative Code. —

For log brands, see 11 AAC 71, art. 5.

Secs. 45.50.330 — 45.50.460.
Pooled music copyright law. [Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1984.]